New Jersey, session 222, S257.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Section 1 of P.L.1992, c.197 (C.11A:4-1.1) is amended to read as follows: 1.  a.  Except as provided in subsection b. of this section concerning law enforcement officer and firefighter examinations, the commission shall establish a $25 fee for each application for an open competitive or promotional examination and a $15 fee for each application for an open competitive or promotional examination by a veteran.  Persons receiving public assistance benefits pursuant to P.L.1947, c.156 (C.44:8-107 et seq.), P.L.1973, c.256 (C.44:7-85 et seq.), or P.L.1997, c.38 (C.44:10-55 et seq.), persons receiving unemployment compensation benefits pursuant to R.S.43:21-1 et seq., or unemployed persons whose unemployment compensation benefits terminated within the previous six months, shall not be required to pay this fee if they apply for an open competitive examination.  Receipts derived from application fees established by this subsection shall be appropriated to the commission.  On or after July 1, 2015, and every five years thereafter, the chairperson of the commission shall review the $25 fee established by this subsection and may modify the fee, provided, however, that the fee, along with the $15 fee, shall not exceed the cost of developing, procuring, and administering the examination. b.    The commission shall establish a fee for each application for an open competitive or promotional examination for a law enforcement officer or firefighter title.  The fee shall not exceed the cost of developing, procuring and administering the examination. Persons receiving public assistance benefits pursuant to P.L.1947, c.156 (C.44:8-107 et seq.), P.L.1973, c.256 (C.44:7-85 et seq.), or P.L.1997, c.38 (C.44:10-55 et seq.), persons receiving unemployment compensation benefits pursuant to R.S.43:21-1 et seq., or unemployed persons whose unemployment compensation benefits terminated within the previous six months, shall not be required to pay this fee if they apply for an open competitive examination. Receipts derived from application fees established by this subsection shall be appropriated to the commission for use in developing, procuring and administering law enforcement officer and firefighter examinations. c.     In addition to the fees established in subsections a. and b. of this section, the commission shall establish a $15 fee for each application for an open competitive or promotional examination for a position in State service.  Persons receiving public assistance benefits pursuant to P.L.1947, c.156 (C.44:8-107 et seq.), P.L.1973, c.256 (C.44:7-85 et seq.), or P.L.1997, c.38 (C.44:10-55 et seq.), persons receiving unemployment compensation benefits pursuant to R.S.43:21-1 et seq., or unemployed persons whose unemployment compensation benefits terminated within the previous six months, shall not be required to pay this fee if they apply for an open competitive examination.  Receipts derived from the application fee established pursuant to this subsection shall be appropriated annually to the commission for the costs of the displaced workers pool program.  This fee shall not be assessed and collected unless the commission implements a displaced workers pool program.  If the displaced workers pool program is terminated at any time by the commission, the assessment and collection of this additional fee shall also be terminated. d.    The commission shall establish a $20 fee for each appeal filed under the provisions of subsection a. or b. of N.J.S.11A:2-6, subsection e. of N.J.S.11A:4-1, N.J.S.11A:8-4, and the rules promulgated thereunder.  Persons who are receiving public assistance benefits pursuant to P.L.1947, c.156 (C.44:8-107 et seq.), P.L.1973, c.256 (C.44:7-85 et seq.), or P.L.1997, c.38 (C.44:10-55 et seq.), persons receiving unemployment compensation benefits pursuant to R.S.43:21-1 et seq., unemployed persons whose unemployment compensation benefits terminated within the previous six months, or persons who are veterans, shall not be required to pay this fee. (cf:  P.L.2010, c.26, s.1) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.